Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 15 METROPOLITAN FOOTBALL STADIUM DISTRICT ACT
32-15-122. Lease of stadium.

Any lease agreement entered into by the district and the franchise shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

A lease term that is, at a minimum, for the same length of time as the length of time the sales tax is levied and collected by the district;

A provision requiring the franchise and its successors and assigns to conduct its complete regular home season schedule and any home play-off events in the stadium for a period of at least twenty years and that such provision shall be specifically enforceable against the franchise and its successors and assigns;

A provision requiring the franchise to advertise and promote events it conducts at the stadium;

A provision requiring the franchise to not unreasonably withhold permission for the holding of other events in the stadium;

A provision requiring the franchise to agree that, during the lease term, the franchise will not limit the broadcast of any game to a pay-per-view broadcast; except that this provision may be waived if the board deems it would violate national football league requirements and except that, if the board waives this provision, the lease agreement shall include a provision requiring the franchise, in addition to the lease payments otherwise required, to pay an amount equal to the amount received by the franchise as a result of any pay-per-view broadcast;

A provision requiring the franchise to guarantee that two thousand tickets for each game held at the stadium are available for sale to the general public. The tickets for preseason and regular season games shall be made available at a cost equal to fifty-percent of the regular ticket price;

A provision requiring the franchise to purchase, or cause to be purchased, any unsold tickets to any football game played by the franchise in the stadium;

A provision requiring the franchise, upon the sale of the franchise or eighty percent of the beneficial interest in the entity owning the franchise, to pay to the district, as a one-time payment, an amount equal to the sharing amount to be used for youth activity programs. As used in this paragraph (h), "sharing amount" means an amount equal to two percent of the net profit realized by the franchise or the persons or entities selling interests, as the case may be, not to be less than one million dollars. Net profit means the gross proceeds of the sale less capital contributions to the franchise (or capital contributions of the person's selling interests), plus six percent imputed annual return on such capital contributions, and less franchise debt if such debt is not assumed or paid by the purchasing entity. Individual sales of the franchise's beneficial interests will not trigger this profit-sharing provision if such sales do not, over a one-year period, result in the sale of eighty percent or more of the beneficial interests of the franchise to a person or entity or related persons or entities that have not been beneficial owners of interests of this franchise.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1073, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(h) added, p. 510, § 16, effective April 22.

32-15-123. Revenue sharing.

After all the principal, interest, and premium, if any, of the special obligation bonds issued pursuant to this article are paid in full and the levy and collection of sales tax and admissions tax revenues by the district is discontinued, but prior to the repeal of this article, any funds collected by the district that are, in the sole discretion of the board, deemed not to be necessary for the anticipated expenses and reserves of the district shall be credited at least annually to the general fund of each county, city and county, city, and town which is included, in whole or in part, in the district based upon the proportion of the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-15-110 within such county, city and county, city, and town to the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-15-110 within the district. For purposes of this section, the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within a county shall not include any sales tax revenues collected in any city or town located within such county. In addition, in computing said proportion, any sales tax revenues collected in any county, city, or town which is not included, in whole or in part, within the geographical boundaries of the district shall not be included in the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within the district.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1073, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 509, § 13, effective April 22.

32-15-124. Report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1074, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 510, § 14, effective April 22.

L. 2001:

Entire section repealed, p. 1180, § 20, effective August 8.

32-15-125. Limitations upon liabilities.

Neither the directors nor any person executing any obligations issued pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be personally liable on the obligations by reason of the issuance thereof. Obligations issued pursuant to this article shall not in any way create or constitute any indebtedness, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, except the district, and nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the district to incur any indebtedness on behalf of or in any way to obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof, except the district, and nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the district to incur any indebtedness on behalf of or in any way to obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof, except as specifically provided in this article.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1074, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-125.5. No action maintainable.

An action or proceeding, at law or in equity, to review any act, resolution, or proceeding or to question the validity or to enjoin the performance of any act, resolution, or proceeding related to the issuance of any bonds or for any other relief against or from any act, resolution, or proceeding done under this article with respect to the financing of the stadium, the election provided in this article, or the actions of the board pursuant to section 32-15-106 (1)(a) to (1)(g), (3), or (5), section 32-15-107, or sections 32-15-110 to 32-15-113, or the validity or execution of the management agreement pursuant to section 32-15-121 or the validity or execution of the lease pursuant to section 32-15-122, whether based upon irregularities or jurisdictional defects, shall not be maintained, unless commenced within thirty days after the performance of the act, resolution, or proceeding or after the effective date thereof, whichever is earlier, and shall be thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 511, § 17, effective April 22.

32-15-126. Sale of real and personal property of district.

Upon completion of the renovation of Mile High stadium or the construction of a new stadium pursuant to the provisions of this article, the board shall make a good faith effort to sell the real and personal property of the district, including the stadium, to any qualified buyer subject to the leasehold interest and other contract rights of the franchise. The board shall establish criteria to determine qualified buyers. The board shall not accept any offer from any qualified buyer for such real and personal property of the district for an amount less than the total amount of outstanding obligations of the district or the amount of sales tax revenues used by the board to acquire a site for the stadium and to construct the stadium, whichever is greater. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the district shall not be required to sell the real and personal property of the district if such sale would adversely affect the federal tax exempt status of the interest on the special obligation bonds issued by the district pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1074, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 7, effective June 3.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 510, § 15, effective April 22.

32-15-127. Limitations upon promotional activities.

No moneys of the district shall be used for promotion of the passage of any question submitted to the voters pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1075, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-128. Football stadium site selection commission - creation - membership.

There is hereby created the football stadium site selection commission which shall consist of eighteen commissioners. The commission shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, shall not be an agency of state government, and shall not be subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state or by the district or the board. Initial appointments to the commission shall be made within forty-five days after August 6, 1996.

Three commissioners shall be appointed by the governor.

One commissioner shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

One commissioner shall be appointed by the president of the senate.

Eleven commissioners shall be appointed as follows:

Two commissioners shall be appointed by the boards of county commissioners of the five counties in the district; and

One commissioner shall be appointed by the mayor and the city council of the city and county of Denver.

One commissioner from state representative district 4 shall be appointed by the mayor of the city and county of Denver after consultation with the members of the general assembly representing state senatorial district 34 and state representative district 4.

One commissioner from state representative district 5 shall be appointed by the mayor of the city and county of Denver after consultation with the members of the general assembly representing state senatorial district 34 and state representative district 5.

No more than three commissioners shall reside in any one county within the district and no more than three commissioners shall reside in the city and county of Denver.

No commissioner shall also serve as a director of the board of the district.

All commissioners appointed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall reside within the geographical boundaries of the district.

Any appointed commissioner may be removed at any time at the pleasure of the person or governing body who appointed such commissioner. If any appointed commissioner vacates the office, a vacancy on the commission shall exist, and the person or governing body who appointed such commissioner vacating the office shall fill such vacancy by appointment.

The appointed commissioners shall elect such officers as deemed necessary and appropriate from among the appointed membership of the commission.

Commissioners shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses while serving as commissioners.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1075, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-129. Commission - powers and duties.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To advise and make recommendations to the board concerning the performance of the duties of the board as set forth in this article;

To establish criteria for selection of a site for a new stadium, including the present Mile High stadium site;

To conduct such investigations and studies as may be necessary in order to evaluate sites within the district that may be suitable for the construction of a stadium, including, without limitation, a study of sports facilities in other cities. In connection with such evaluation process, the commission shall consult with representatives of any city, town, city and county, or county included, in whole or in part, in the district, the chambers of commerce located within the district, the board of directors of the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district, the Colorado baseball commission, and any other individuals, groups of individuals, or entities that may provide any relevant expertise concerning the evaluation of sites for a new stadium. In addition, the commission shall consult with the urban land institute pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-132 concerning the evaluation of sites, including Mile High stadium.

To select a single site within the district for the location of a new stadium or the Mile High stadium site after consideration of the results of the investigations, studies, evaluation, and consultations set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1);

To prepare and transmit a report notifying the board of the site selected by the commission;

To formulate and adopt an annual budget to govern the expenses of the commission in undertaking its activities;

To adopt, and from time to time amend or repeal, such bylaws and rules and regulations as it may consider to be necessary or advisable and to keep a record of its proceedings, which record shall be open to inspection by the public at all reasonable times;

To contract for those services, including services for necessary personnel, and materials required by the activities of the commission;

To administer and use moneys received by the commission in accordance with the provisions of this section;

To receive and expend donations or grants from any private source or from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States government to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of this section subject to the conditions upon which the donations or grants are made; however, nothing in this paragraph (j) shall authorize the commission to accept or expend public moneys, whether as gifts, grants, or other forms of contribution, from the state, the board, the franchise, any city, town, city and county, or county;

To deposit any moneys received by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this section in any banking institution within the state or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and to appoint, for purposes of making such deposits, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the commission, who may be required to give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board may require; and

To develop reporting and review requirements governing the receipt and expenditures of any moneys received by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this section. The account of all moneys received by and expended by the commission shall be a public record and shall be open for inspection by the public at all reasonable times.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1076, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1)(b) to (1)(d) amended, p. 1496, § 8, effective June 3; (1)(c) amended, p. 1028, § 60, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(c) by House Bill 97-1220 and Senate Bill 97-230 were harmonized.

32-15-130. Conflicts of interest prohibited.

No commissioner may vote in favor of a specific stadium site if such commissioner or any member of the immediate family of such commissioner has any direct or indirect financial interest in the real property on which the stadium would be located or any real property which would be significantly benefited by the construction of a stadium. No commissioner shall accept employment with the franchise within a one-year period after the commissioner has terminated service as a member of the site selection commission.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1077, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-131. Criteria - stadium site - stadium.

The commission shall establish criteria for any stadium site. In establishing such criteria, the commission shall consider factors that it deems relevant, including, but not limited to:

The need for access to the site by motor vehicles, pedestrians, and others using the stadium, including the proximity to highways, the capacity of surrounding streets and highways to handle traffic, the proximity to actual and proposed public transportation, and the overall convenience to the citizens of the district;

The extent to which financial incentives from private sources, including landowners and developers, may be maximized in order to reduce the amount of public moneys required to be expended for a stadium site;

The extent to which the economic potential resulting from the location of a stadium may be maximized, including the compatibility of a stadium with other actual or proposed development;

The compatibility of a stadium with surrounding neighborhoods;

The existence of readily available fire and police protection services;

The existence or the potential for the existence of adequate parking facilities for motor vehicles in the immediately surrounding area.

Any incentive offered by a city, city and county, county, or other local government to induce the commission to select a site within such city, city and county, county, or other local government shall be binding and enforceable against the city, city and county, county, or other local government if the commission selects a site located within the boundaries of such city, city and county, county, or other local government.

The commission shall not select a site located within the jurisdiction of a governmental entity having the authority to impose any construction- or land development-related permits and fees unless such governmental entity agrees to waive such permits and fees to the extent the charge for such permits and fees exceeds the actual cost incurred by the governmental entity for the service provided by the governmental entity in connection with such permits and fees.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1077, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

IP(1) amended, p. 1497, § 9, effective June 3.

32-15-132. Consultation with urban land institute - consideration of recommendations.

The commission shall consult with and shall consider any recommendations made by the urban land institute in regard to the duty of the commission to select a stadium site.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1078, § 1, effective May 23.

32-15-133. Repeal of article.

This article is repealed, effective as of the earliest occurrence of the following:

Five years after July 1, 2003, if the board has not submitted the question set forth in section 32-15-107 (1) to the registered electors within the geographic boundaries of the district pursuant to the provisions of said section; or

At such time as a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district vote negatively on the question set forth in section 32-15-107 (1) and the board has adopted a resolution declaring that the affairs of the district have been wound up or ninety days have passed since such negative vote, whichever occurs first; or

Upon the completion of the sale of the stadium by the board to any qualified buyer pursuant to the provisions of section 32-15-126.

Upon repeal of this article, any funds collected by the district but not used for the purposes set forth in this article shall be credited to the general fund of each county, city and county, city, and town that is included, in whole or in part, in the district based upon the proportion of the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-15-110 within such county, city and county, city, and town to the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-15-110 within the district. For purposes of this subsection (2), the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within a county shall not include any sales tax revenues collected in any city or town located within such county. In addition, in computing said proportion, any sales tax revenues collected in any county, city, or town that is not included, in whole or in part, within the geographical boundaries of the district shall not be included in the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within the district.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1078, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1)(b) amended, p. 511, § 18, effective April 22.

Editor's note:

This article remains in effect since the question of authorizing the district to levy and collect a sales tax was approved on November 3, 1998, by a majority of the registered electors, and the sale of the stadium by the board has not taken place.